Florida, session 2026, HB513.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 430.505, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
430.505 Alzheimer's Disease Awareness Initiative.—
(1) The Department of Elderly Affairs shall contract for
the development and implementation of the Alzheimer's Disease
Awareness Initiative. The initiative must provide an opportunity
for those affected by Alzheimer's disease and related forms of
dementia in this state to benefit from greater support and
obtain information that is validated in national research.
(2) The initiative must, at a minimum:
(a) Include a website and other related electronic
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb513-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 513 2026
resources that will address all of the following:
1. The advantages of early detection and diagnosis.
2. How to reduce risk factors.
3. The importance of brain health.
4. The importance of talking to a professional about being
screened and assessed for Alzheimer's Disease and related forms
of dementia.
5. How to promote healthy aging.
6. Recent progress in Alzheimer's research and the
availability of clinical trials.
7. Community resources available for those affected by the
disease and related forms of dementia.
8. Any related topics as deemed appropriate by the
Department of Elderly Affairs.
(b) Use the Department of Health's Alzheimer's Disease and
Related Dementias Resource Guide as a part of the initiative
materials.
(c) Promote health care provider education in partnership
with the Department of Health to help improve care and services
for patients with Alzheimer's disease and related forms of
dementia in accordance with s. 381.825.
(d) Use print, outdoor, and digital advertising, social
media platforms, and public events.
(e) Include a statewide mobile in-person outreach program
that prioritizes those in underserved communities and provide
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb513-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 513 2026
information on issues relating to Alzheimer's disease and
related forms of dementia, including, but not limited to, brain
health, risk education, and early detection and diagnosis. The
program may also provide referrals to the Department of Elderly
Affairs and provide information regarding any available
community resources relating to Alzheimer's disease and related
forms of dementia.
(3)(a) The entity with which the Department of Elderly
Affairs contracts for the Alzheimer's Disease Awareness
Initiative must be a statewide nonprofit organization that:
1. Has a history of focusing on those affected by
Alzheimer's disease and related forms of dementia, care,
support, and research including providing online resources to
caregivers and people living with the disease and through
community-based events.
2. Has the organizational capacity to manage a statewide
initiative and successfully carry out the requirements of this
section.
(b) The entity must collaborate with other relevant
agencies of state government and private organizations to
develop and implement the initiative. Such agencies of state
government must collaborate with the entity with which the
department contracts to carry out the initiative.
(4) The Alzheimer's Disease Advisory Committee shall
annually evaluate and make recommendations to the Department of
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb513-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 513 2026
Elderly Affairs and the Legislature concerning the need for
future funding for the Alzheimer's Disease Awareness Initiative
each year as a part of its annual report.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb513-00